Massachusetts, session 194th, H4610.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
Chapter 272 of the General Laws is hereby amended by adding after section 53B the 
following section, which shall be titled “Interagency commission to study the decriminalization 
of sex work in the Commonwealth”:-  
Section 53C. Interagency Commission to Study the Decriminalization of Sex Work in the 
Commonwealth. 
(a) There shall be an interagency commission to study the decriminalization of sex work 
in the Commonwealth. The commission shall consist of 23 members: the secretary of health and 
human services or a designee, who shall serve as chair; the commissioner of public health or a 
designee; the secretary of labor and workforce development or a designee; the secretary of 
housing and  livable communities or a designee; the  commissioner of children and families or a 
designee; the attorney general or a designee; the president of the Massachusetts District 
Attorneys Association or a designee; 15 members appointed by the secretary of health and 
human services or a designee, 1 of whom shall be a representative from an organization focused 

of 3 14 on advocacy for sex workers, 1 of whom shall be a representative from an organization focused 
on advocating for transgender people and racial justice, 5 of whom shall be survivors or direct 
service providers from organizations representing survivors of trafficking for sexual servitude 
across regions of the commonwealth1 of whom shall be a representative from the Boston Area 
Rape Crisis Center, 1 of whom shall be a representative from the American Civil Liberties Union 
of Massachusetts, 1 of whom shall be a representative from an organization focused on harm 
reduction related to substance use, 1 of whom shall be a representative from an organization 
focused on advocating for legal defense and bonds for undocumented people, 1 of whom shall be 
a representative from the Committee for Public Counsel Services, and 3 of whom shall be current 
or former sex workers. Adequate compensation for services shall be determined by a schedule of 
fees adopted by the commission.   
(b) The commission shall be responsible for studying and making recommendations 
towards the following: (i) what criminal penalties and collateral consequences exist related to the 
criminalization of sex work, including criminal penalties for buyers of commercial sex; (ii) what 
labor protections need to be in place under decriminalization; (iii) what services need to be made 
available to people engaged in commercial sex to improve health and safety outcomes; (iv) the 
methods of human trafficking and exploitation in order to develop strategies to reduce these 
activities in collaboration with sex workers, with a focus on prevention; (v) implementation 
models for alternatives to policing to promote safety in the commercial sex sector, rooted in 
public health; and (vi) the development of a fund to prevent, reduce, prevent, and eliminate 
human trafficking that shall include ways to support the health, safety, and autonomy of sex 
workers. 

of 3 36  (c) The first meeting of the commission shall take place within 90 days of the effective 
date of this act. The commission shall file a report containing its findings and recommendations, 
including legislative recommendations, if any, with the clerks of the house of representatives and 
the senate, the house and senate committees on ways and means and the joint committee on 
public health no later than December 31, 2026.